Utah statutes.
48-2e-1002.   Derivative action.

A partner may maintain a derivative action to enforce a right of a limited partnership if:

(1)  the partner first makes a demand on the general partners, requesting that they cause the limited partnership to bring an action to enforce the right, and the general partners do not bring the action within a reasonable time; or

(2)  a demand under Subsection (1) would be futile.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

